Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5579.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 39-1 of the General Laws entitled "Public Utilities Commission" is
hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
39-1-33.1. Report on electrification.
The public utilities commission shall produce a report by January 1, 2026 and each January
1 thereafter, containing an analysis of the electric grid and its ability and/or capacity to handle the
electrification load needed to power cars, buildings, and heating of homes within the state. Said
report shall be provided to the speaker of the house, the senate president, and the governor.
SECTION 2. Section 39-1-37.1 of the General Laws in Chapter 39-1 entitled "Public
Utilities Commission" is hereby amended to read as follows:
39-1-37.1. Ratepayers advisory board.
(a) There is hereby established the ratepayers advisory board. The advisory board shall
consist of the following public members:
(1) Four (4) members appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives, one of
whom shall represent the interests of residential ratepayers; one of whom shall represent the
interests of the elderly and disabled; one of whom shall represent a community-based consumer
organization representing low-income individuals; and one of whom shall represent a LIHEAP
consumer.
(2) Four (4) members appointed by the senate president, one of whom shall represent the
interests of residential ratepayers; one of whom shall represent a chamber of commerce; one of

whom shall represent a nonprofit energy consortium of businesses; and one of whom shall represent
a community action agency LIHEAP program provider.
(3) Three (3) members appointed by the governor, one of whom shall represent the
LIHEAP program administration; one of whom shall represent the interests of small business
owners; and one of whom shall represent the interests of residents of affordable housing be the
commissioner or the acting commissioner of the office of energy resources.
(b) The appointments to the advisory board shall be made as follows: each appointing
authority shall appoint one member to serve a term of one year, one member to serve a term of two
(2) years, and one member to serve a term of three (3) years. Thereafter, each member appointed
to the advisory board shall serve a three-year (3) term. The board members are eligible to succeed
themselves. A vacancy, other than by expiration of a term, shall be filled in the manner of the
original appointment, but only for the unexpired portion of the term.
(c) Five (5) members shall constitute a quorum. A majority vote of the board shall be
required for all recommendations, advice, and approvals of the board, in accordance with this
section.
(d) A board member shall not receive compensation for his or her service on the board but
may receive reimbursement for travel and other necessary expenses, while engaged in the
performance of official duties of the board.
(e) The board shall elect annually a chairperson and vice chairperson from among its
membership chairperson of the board shall be the commissioner or acting commissioner of the
office of energy resources.
(f) The board shall receive staff and administrative support from the division, to organize
meetings and take and distribute minutes. The division shall also furnish the advisory board a
suitable location to hold its meetings.
(g) The board shall meet at least quarterly monthly and at the call of the chairperson or four
(4) board members. The administrator shall be present for all board meetings to inform the board
of the actions of the division and to respond to the board’s inquiries.
(h) The board shall review legislative proposals and comment on existing state laws
relating to residential ratepayers.
(i) The board shall advise the administrator on matters concerning residential ratepayers
including, but not limited to utility shutoff policies, rate affordability, conservation measures,
consumer education, smart meters and/or restricted use meters, customer service charges,
legislation pending before the general assembly, and legislative initiatives.
(j) The advisory board shall issue an annual report of findings, including recommendations
LC001533 - Page 2 of 4

on current or proposed state programs, policies, regulations, and laws, to the governor and the
general assembly.
(k) The board shall be subject to the provisions of chapter 2 of title 38, access to public
records act, and chapter 46 of title 42, open meetings act.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001533
========
LC001533 - Page 3 of 4